Hawaii statutes.
§183D-37 Retail dealer's license. The
keeper of a hotel, restaurant, boardinghouse, or club, or any retail dealer in
meats, may sell carcasses or parts thereof purchased or received from a
licensed game bird farm, tagged and sealed, to any patron or consumer for
actual consumption, after securing a license for those purposes from the county
director of finance. The license shall cost $5 a year, and shall expire on
June 30 of each year. [L 1985, c 174, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next